Utah statutes.
41-6a-301.   Standards and specifications for uniform system of traffic-control devices and school crossing guards.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Department of Transportation shall make rules consistent with this chapter adopting standards and establishing specifications for a uniform system of traffic-control devices used on a highway.

(2)  The standards and specifications adopted under Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  include provisions for school crossing zones and use of school crossing guards; and

(b)  correlate with, and where possible conform to, the system set forth in the most recent edition of the "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways" and other standards issued or endorsed by the federal highway administrator.

